North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-17.2 Physician Loan Repayment Program [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 294, §
8]

§
43-17.2-01.
State-community matching physician loan repayment program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 464, § 1; 2005, ch. 360, § 1; 2015, ch. 297, § 31, effective August 1, 2015; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

§
43-17.2-02.
Powers of state health council. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 464, § 2; 2005, ch. 360, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

§
43-17.2-03.
Physician selection criteria — Eligibility for loan repayment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 464, § 3; 2005, ch. 360, § 3; 2011, ch. 3, § 19; 2015, ch. 297, § 31, effective August 1, 2015; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

§
43-17.2-04.
Community selection criteria. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 464, § 4; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

§
43-17.2-05.
Eligible loans. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 464, § 5; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

§
43-17.2-06.
Breach of loan repayment contract. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 464, § 6; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

§
43-17.2-07.
Release from contract obligation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 464, § 7; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

§
43-17.2-08.
Term of obligated service. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 464, § 8; 2005, ch. 360, § 4; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.

§
43-17.2-09.
Payment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 464, § 9; repealed by 2015, ch. 294, § 8, effective August 1, 2015.